Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 2 Judicial Emergency

Editor’s notes.

— For application of this part in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 07.31.20.02, 09.15.20.01, 09.30.20.02, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, 3.31.21.03, and 05.28.21.02.

Cross references.

War on Terrorism Local Assistance, T. 36, C. 75.

Court security and emergency operations, Ga. Unif. Super. Ct. 45.

Practicing law when emergencies impact justice system, Ga. S. Ct. 121.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 420, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Judicial Emergency Act of 2004.’ ”

Ga. L. 2004, p. 420, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that the proper functioning of this state’s judicial system is essential to the administration of justice. Further, the General Assembly finds that our courts are subject to being disrupted and the rights of the people are subject to being denied in the event of certain attacks or emergencies, whether natural or man-made in origin. The General Assembly finds that it is in the best interests of the proper functioning of the courts and, ultimately, of the people, to provide our judicial system with a means by which to adjust certain rights, deadlines, and schedules to take into account the potentially devastating effects of a judicial emergency.”

For application of this part in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 07.31.20.02, 09.15.20.01, 09.30.20.02, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, 3.31.21.03, and 05.28.21.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

Law reviews.

For article, “Statewide Judicial Emergency:
Judicial Order by the Supreme Court of Georgia Declaring a Statewide Judicial Emergency,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 31 (2020).

38-3-60.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Authorized judicial official” means any of the following officials when acting with regard to his or her respective jurisdiction:

The Chief Justice of the Georgia Supreme Court;

A chief judge of a Georgia superior court judicial circuit; or

The replacement for or successor to any of the officials set forth in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph, as determined by the applicable rules of incapacitation and succession, should such official become incapacitated or otherwise unable to act.

“Judicial emergency” means:

A state of emergency declared by the Governor under Part 1 of this article;

A public health emergency under Code Section 31-12-1.1;

A local emergency under Code Section 36-69-2; or

Such other serious emergency

when, as determined by an authorized judicial official, the emergency substantially endangers or infringes upon the normal functioning of the judicial system, the ability of persons to avail themselves of the judicial system, or the ability of litigants or others to have access to the courts or to meet schedules or time deadlines imposed by court order or rule, statute, or administrative rule or regulation.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 420, § 3; Ga. L. 2011, p. 701, § 2/HB 339.

Cross references.

Provision of legal services following determination of major disaster, S. Ct. R. 121.

38-3-61.
Declaration of judicial emergency; duration of judicial emergency declaration; designation of alternative facility in lieu of court.

An authorized judicial official is authorized to declare the existence of a judicial emergency which shall be done by order either upon his or her own motion or upon motion by any interested person. The order shall state:

The identity and position of the issuing authorized judicial official;

The time, date, and place at which the order is executed;

The jurisdiction or jurisdictions affected by the order;

The nature of the emergency necessitating the order;

The period or duration of the judicial emergency; and

Any other information relevant to the suspension or restoration of court operations.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 38-3-62, an order declaring the existence of a judicial emergency shall be limited to an initial duration of not more than 30 days; provided, however, that the order may be modified or extended for no more than two periods not exceeding 30 days each unless a public health emergency exists as set forth in Code Section 38-3-51, in which case the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Georgia may extend the emergency order for so long as such emergency exists, as declared by the Governor. Any modification or extension of the initial order shall require information regarding the same matters set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section for the issuance of the initial order.

In the event the circumstances underlying the judicial emergency make access to the office of a clerk of court or a courthouse impossible or impractical, the order declaring the judicial emergency shall designate another facility, which is reasonably accessible and appropriate, for the conduct of court business.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 420, § 3; Ga. L. 2011, p. 701, § 3/HB 339; Ga. L. 2021, p. 452, § 1/SB 163.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “Except as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 38-3-62, an order” for “An order” at the beginning of subsection (b).

38-3-62.
Suspension or tolling of deadlines and time schedules in event of judicial emergency; statutory speedy trial requirements defined.

An authorized judicial official in an order declaring a judicial emergency, or in an order modifying or extending a judicial emergency order, is authorized to suspend, toll, extend, or otherwise grant relief from deadlines or other time schedules or filing requirements imposed by otherwise applicable statutes, rules, regulations, or court orders, whether in civil or criminal cases or administrative matters, including, but not limited to:

A statute of limitation;

The time within which to issue a warrant;

The time within which to try a case for which a demand for speedy trial has been filed;

The time within which to hold a commitment hearing;

A deadline or other schedule regarding the detention of a juvenile;

The time within which to return a bill of indictment or an accusation or to bring a matter before a grand jury;

The time within which to file a writ of habeas corpus;

The time within which discovery or any aspect thereof is to be completed;

The time within which to serve a party;

The time within which to appeal or to seek the right to appeal any order, ruling, or other determination; and

Such other legal proceedings as determined to be necessary by the authorized judicial official.

As used in this subsection, the term “statutory speedy trial requirements” means all speedy trial deadlines, time schedules, or filing requirements imposed by Code Section 17-7-170 or 17-7-171.

A chief judge of a Georgia superior court judicial circuit or a chief judge of a Georgia state court may suspend, toll, extend, modify, or otherwise grant relief from statutory speedy trial requirements following a judicial emergency if compliance with such requirements is impracticable, subject to the requirements under subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.

Relief under this subsection shall be authorized if a chief judge certifies that under the totality of the circumstances arising from the preceding judicial emergency, compliance with statutory speedy trial requirements is impracticable in the applicable county or court following a judicial emergency due to the following factors:

A pending criminal case volume that is substantially above the average pending criminal case volume at the end of each of the three full calendar years preceding the judicial emergency;

An annualized criminal case clearance rate in the current calendar year that is substantially below the average criminal case clearance rate for each of the three full calendar years preceding the judicial emergency;

The number of speedy trial demands pending within one month of the date of certification;

The number of jury trials held during the last full term of court;

Ongoing space limitations or other health or safety concerns regarding the use of the facilities available to conduct criminal trials and related activities;

The limited availability of judges, courtroom personnel, prosecutors, public defenders, expert witnesses, forensic analysis, law enforcement officers, or other relevant persons;

The extent of efforts made by prosecuting attorneys and the court to reduce the number of criminal defendants held in custody awaiting trial; and

Other relevant facts that justify ongoing relief from statutory speedy trial requirements, if any.

An order granting relief under this subsection shall be accompanied by a certification that compliance with statutory speedy trial requirements is impracticable in the applicable county or court. Each time a chief judge issues an order granting relief under this subsection, he or she shall:

Certify that compliance with statutory speedy trial requirements is impracticable in the applicable county or court; or

Attach such certification provided by either:

A majority of the superior court judges in his or her judicial circuit pursuant to paragraph (6) of this subsection; or

A majority of the state court judges in his or her county pursuant to paragraph (8) of this subsection.

Each certification issued pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection shall include the following:

Supporting statistical data and findings of fact to justify relief under paragraph (2) of this subsection; and

A plan to resolve cases in which a statutory speedy trial demand has been filed as expeditiously as possible. The plan shall establish an order of priority in which such cases will be called for trial, giving highest priority to such cases of defendants who have been held in custody for the longest time as a result of the charges in the case. The plan shall also state the number of trial weeks scheduled for each judge in the applicable county or court during the period of relief granted under this subsection.

A chief judge of a superior court judicial circuit acting under this subsection:

May act independently of any emergency declared by the Governor;

May grant relief from statutory speedy trial requirements in a superior court for a county in his or her judicial circuit;

May act in his or her own discretion; and

Shall act upon the request of a majority of the active superior court judges in his or her judicial circuit pursuant to paragraph (6) of this subsection.

A chief judge of a superior court judicial circuit shall grant relief from speedy trial requirements in a superior court for a county in his or her judicial circuit if such action is requested by a majority of the active superior court judges in his or her judicial circuit. Any such request shall be in writing and be accompanied by the certification required in paragraph (3) of this subsection.

A chief judge of a state court acting under this subsection:

May act independently of any emergency declared by the Governor;

May grant relief from statutory speedy trial requirements in his or her state court;

May act in his or her own discretion; and

Shall act upon the request of a majority of the active state court judges in his or her county pursuant to paragraph (8) of this subsection.

A chief judge of a state court shall grant relief from speedy trial requirements in his or her state court if such action is requested by a majority of the active state court judges in his or her county. Any such request shall be in writing and be accompanied by the certification required in paragraph (3) of this subsection.

Each period of relief granted under this subsection:

Shall not exceed a total of eight months; and

Shall end on the last day of a term of court.

Each time a chief judge issues an order granting relief under this subsection, he or she shall provide notice of such action to judicial officials and the public in the same manner provided in Code Section 38-3-63, except that such notice shall also include the certification required under paragraph (3) of this subsection.

The Chief Justice of the Georgia Supreme Court may, by order and in his or her sole discretion, reinstate any statutory speedy trial requirement subject to an order granting relief under this subsection. The Chief Justice shall provide notice of such action to judicial officials and the public in the same manner provided in Code Section 38-3-63. If the Chief Justice takes such action, a chief judge shall not grant subsequent relief from statutory speedy trial requirements in the applicable county or court following the same judicial emergency unless subsequent relief is reauthorized by the Chief Justice.

Nothing in this subsection shall relieve the state of its constitutional obligation to provide for a speedy and public criminal trial.

This subsection shall be in effect until June 30, 2023, and no order granting relief under this subsection shall be issued after such date.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-62

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 420, § 3; Ga. L. 2006, p. 893, § 6/HB 1421; Ga. L. 2021, p. 452, § 2/SB 163.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a) and added subsection (b).

Cross references.

Right to speedy trial, U.S. Const., amend. 6.

Speedy trial, §§

17-7-170

,

17-8-33

.

38-3-63.
Notification to other judicial officials and public.

Upon an authorized judicial official issuing an order declaring the existence of a judicial emergency, or any modification or extension of such an order, the authorized judicial official issuing the order, modification, or extension to the extent permitted by the circumstances underlying the judicial emergency shall:

Immediately notify the Chief Justice of the Georgia Supreme Court of the action;

Notify and serve a copy of the order, modification, or extension on the judges and clerks of all courts sitting within the jurisdictions affected and on the clerks of the Georgia Court of Appeals and the Georgia Supreme Court, such service to be accomplished through reasonable means to assure expeditious receipt; and

Give notice of the issuance of the order, modification, or extension to the affected parties, counsel for the affected parties, and the public. Notice shall be provided by whatever means are reasonably calculated to reach the affected parties, counsel for the affected parties, and the public and may, without limitation, include mailing, publication in a newspaper of local or state-wide distribution, posting of written notices at courthouses and other public gathering sites, transmittal by facsimile or e-mail, and announcements on television, radio, and public address systems.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-63

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 420, § 3.

38-3-64.
[Effective until July 1, 2023. See note.] Appeal rights of adversely affected parties; cost of appeal borne by state.

Any person whose rights or interests are adversely affected by an order declaring the existence of a judicial emergency or any modification or extension of such an order shall be entitled to appeal.

A notice of appeal shall be filed no later than 45 days after the expiration of the judicial emergency order, or any modification or extension of a judicial emergency order, from which an appeal is sought. A notice of appeal shall be filed with the clerk of a superior court in any jurisdiction affected by the order and shall be served upon:

The authorized judicial official who issued the order;

The parties to any criminal proceeding or civil litigation in which the appellant is involved which would be affected by the appeal;

The district attorney of the county in which the notice of appeal is filed; and

All other parties in any criminal proceeding or civil litigation which would be affected by the appeal; provided, however, that service in this regard shall be accomplished by publishing notice of the filing of the appeal in the newspaper which is the legal organ for the county in which the notice of the appeal is filed.

The appeal shall be heard immediately by the Georgia Court of Appeals under the procedure of emergency motions. A party dissatisfied by the judgment of the Georgia Court of Appeals may appeal as a matter of right to the Georgia Supreme Court. Filing fees for these appeals shall be waived. All costs of court shall be borne by the state. Appeals shall be heard expeditiously.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-64

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 420, § 3.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 38-3-64 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective until July 1, 2023. For version effective July 1, 2023, see the following version.

38-3-64.
[Effective July 1, 2023. See note.] Appeal rights of adversely affected parties; cost of appeal borne by state.

Any person whose rights or interests are adversely affected by an order declaring the existence of a judicial emergency or any modification or extension of such an order shall be entitled to appeal.

A petition for review shall be filed no later than 45 days after the expiration of the judicial emergency order, or any modification or extension of a judicial emergency order, from which an appeal is sought. A petition for review shall be filed with the clerk of a superior court in any jurisdiction affected by the order and shall be served upon:

The authorized judicial official who issued the order;

The parties to any criminal proceeding or civil litigation in which the appellant is involved which would be affected by the appeal;

The district attorney of the county in which the petition for review is filed; and

All other parties in any criminal proceeding or civil litigation which would be affected by the appeal; provided, however, that service in this regard shall be accomplished by publishing notice of the filing of the appeal in the newspaper which is the legal organ for the county in which the petition for review is filed.

The appeal shall be heard immediately by the Georgia Court of Appeals under the procedure of emergency motions. A party dissatisfied by the judgment of the Georgia Court of Appeals may appeal as a matter of right to the Georgia Supreme Court. Filing fees for these appeals shall be waived. All costs of court shall be borne by the state. Appeals shall be heard expeditiously.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-64

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 420, § 3; Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 2-30/HB 916.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 38-3-64 is set out twice in this Code. This version, as set out above, is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, substituted “petition for review” for “notice of appeal” twice in the introductory language of subsection (b) and in paragraph (b)(3), and substituted “petition for review” for “notice of the appeal” in paragraph (b)(4). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 3-1/HB 916, not codified by the General Assembly, makes this Code section applicable to petitions for review filed in superior or state court on or after July 1, 2023.